Arkansas, session 2025, HB1062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Eighty percent (80%) of those surveyed in an American
Psychological Association Task Force on Violence Against Educators and School
Personnel survey reported being victims of threats or violent acts at least
one (1) time at their schools, with fifty-six percent (56%) of teachers
surveyed reporting being victimized by students; and
(2) Nearly one million three hundred thousand (1,300,000) acts
of student-on-teacher violence were reported in a National Education
Association study.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Provide a safe environment for teachers and students to work
and learn in the State of Arkansas;
*TNL034*
03-31-2025 13:14:14 TNL034

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 H2/3/25 H2/18/25 H2/26/25 H3/31/25 HB1062
(2) Ensure that teachers and students do not suffer from
repeated violent or abusive behavior from students; and
(3) Ensure proper measures are in place to prevent repeated acts
of violence in schools.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-511 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-511. Removal by teacher.
(a) Consistent with state and federal law, a teacher may remove a
student from class and send him or her to the principal's or principal's
designee's office in order to maintain effective discipline in the classroom.
(b) A teacher may remove from class a student:
(1) Who has been documented by the teacher as repeatedly
interfering with the teacher's ability to teach the students in the class or
with the ability of the student's classmates to learn; or
(2) Whose behavior the teacher determines is so unruly,
disruptive, violent, or abusive that it seriously interferes with the
teacher's ability to teach the students in the class or with the ability of
the student's classmates to learn.
(c) If Except as provided under subsection (e) of this section, if a
teacher removes a student from class in accordance with subsection (b) of
this section, the principal or his or her designee may:
(1) Place the student into another appropriate classroom
learning environment or into in-school suspension so long as the placement is
consistent with the public school district's written student discipline
policy;
(2) Return the student to the class; or
(3) Take other appropriate action consistent with the public
school district's discipline policy, state law, and federal law.
(d)(1)(A) If Each time a teacher removes a student from class two (2) times
during any nine-week grading period or its equivalent as determined by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, the principal or the
principal's designee may shall not return the student to the teacher's class
unless until a conference is held for the purpose of determining the causes
of the problem and possible solutions, with the following individuals
present:
(A)(i) The principal or the principal's designee
03-31-2025 13:14:14 TNL034

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 H2/3/25 H2/18/25 H2/26/25 H3/31/25 HB1062
(B)(ii) The teacher;
(C)(iii) The school counselor;
(D)(iv) The parents, guardians, or persons standing in
loco parentis; and
(E)(v) The student, if appropriate.
(B) However, a teacher is not required to remove a student
from class each time the student is unruly or disruptive during the teacher's
class.
(2) The failure of the parents, guardians, or persons in loco
parentis to attend the conference provided for in this subsection required
under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall not prevent the conference
from being held nor or prevent any action from being taken as a result of
that conference.
(3) If a student with a disability identified under the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., as it
existed on January 1, 2025, or Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,
Pub. L. No. 93-112, as it existed on January 1, 2025, is removed under this
subsection (d), then the conference required under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall serve as a manifestation determination review as required under
subsection (f) of this section.
(4) If it is determined during a conference held under this
subsection (d) that the student was removed from the teacher's class because
of violent behavior, the individuals conducting the conference shall
determine if a behavioral threat assessment is necessary for the student.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, a student
who is removed from a class under subsection (b) of this section due to
violent or abusive behavior against a teacher or another student shall:
(1)(A) Be placed in an appropriate interim learning environment
for the duration of the review and conference as required by subsection (d)
of this section.
(B) While the student is in an appropriate interim
learning environment as required by subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section,
the student shall be subject to the relevant written student discipline
policies prescribed by his or her public school district; and
(2) Not be placed in a class with the teacher or student against
whom the violent or abusive behavior was directed if it is determined that
03-31-2025 13:14:14 TNL034

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 H2/3/25 H2/18/25 H2/26/25 H3/31/25 HB1062
the student may leave the appropriate interim learning environment and return
to the placement from which he or she was removed.
(f)(1)(A) If the violent or abusive behavior for which a student is
removed from class under this section is determined to be a manifestation of
the student's disability following a manifestation determination review of
the student's violent or abusive behavior under subdivision (f)(2) of this
section, then the student shall be temporarily placed in an appropriate
interim learning environment within the public school district for no more
than ten (10) days while the members of the manifestation determination
review team determine the appropriate course of action under this subsection
(f).
(B) While the student is in an appropriate interim
learning environment as required by subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section,
the student shall be subject to the relevant written student discipline
policies prescribed by his or her public school district.
(2) If the public school district, teacher against whom the
violent or abusive behavior was directed, parents, legal guardians, or
persons standing in loco parentis to the student, and relevant members of the
student's individualized education program under § 6-41-217 determine that
the student requires a change of placement, then the public school district,
teacher against whom the violent or abusive behavior was directed, parents,
legal guardians, or persons standing in loco parentis to the student, and
relevant members of the student's individualized education program shall
conduct a manifestation determination review, which shall include all
relevant information in the student's file, including the student's
individualized education program under § 6-41-217, teacher observations, and
other relevant information provided by the parent or legal guardian of the
student.
(g) If a student is removed from a classroom under this
section due to violent or abusive behavior three (3) or more times during one
(1) school year, the student shall be:
(1) Placed in an appropriate interim learning environment for
the remainder of the school year; or
(2) Disciplined according to the requirements of the written
student discipline policy of the public school district in which the student
is enrolled.
03-31-2025 13:14:14 TNL034

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 H2/3/25 H2/18/25 H2/26/25 H3/31/25 HB1062
(h) As used in this section:
(1) "Appropriate interim learning environment" means an
appropriate learning environment that is used for a period of time not to
exceed ten (10) days;
(2) "Appropriate learning environment" means a setting within a
public school or public school district that provides a similar structure to
the following without limitation:
(A) A classroom; or;
(B) In-school suspension; and
(3) "Violent or abusive behavior" means without limitation:
(A) Using threatening language;
(B) Throwing an item that risks or causes:
(i) Harm to another individual;
(ii) Injury to another individual; or
(iii) Damage to property;
(C) Physically abusing a teacher or another student; or
(D) Any other similar action that presents a physical
danger or a threat of physical danger to a teacher or another student.
(i) This section does not apply to:
(1) An educational facility of the Division of Youth Services;
(2) An educational facility that contracts with the division; or
(3) The Arkansas Correctional School District.






/s/R. Scott Richardson







03-31-2025 13:14:14 TNL034